Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.170

Expiration of licenses.

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, licenses issued under this chapter expire as follows:

(a) A salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit license expires one year from issuance or when the insurance required by RCW 18.16.175(1)(g) expires, whichever occurs first;

(b) A school license expires one year from issuance; and

(c) Cosmetologist, hair designer, barber, manicurist, esthetician, master esthetician, and instructor licenses expire two years from issuance.

(2) The director may provide for expiration dates other than those set forth in subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of establishing staggered renewal periods.

[ 2015 c 62 s 6; 2013 c 187 s 6; 2002 c 111 s 10; 1991 c 324 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 111: See note following RCW 18.16.010.